dev/nouns/nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>

%<nt%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<nom%>
%<erg%>
%<gen%>
%<dat%>

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON C-I

LEXICON N-II-SG
! II-й тип

%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ялъ # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ялъул # ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ялъе # ;

LEXICON N-II-PL
! II-й тип

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>би # ;
%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>баз # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>базул # ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>базе # ;

LEXICON N-SCENA
! сцена (-ялъ, -ялъул, -би) 

%<n%>%<nt%>: N-II-SG ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>: N-II-PL ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Nouns 

сцена:сцена N-SCENA ; ! "сцена"
